Utah statutes.
73-3a-109.   Certification of appropriation or change.

(1)  Any person holding an application approved under this chapter shall comply with the substantive and procedural requirements of Sections 73-3-16 and 73-3-17 to obtain a certificate of appropriation or change.

(2)  Verification that the appropriation or change has been perfected and put to beneficial use may be accepted from the recipient state's equivalent to the Utah state engineer.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1991 General Session

